North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50. Divorce and Alimony.
Article 3. Family Law Arbitration Act.
§ 50-62.
Construction; uniformity of interpretation.

Certain provisions of this Article have been adapted from the Uniform Arbitration Act formerly in force in this State, the Revised Uniform Arbitration Act in force in this State, the North Carolina International Commercial Arbitration and Conciliation Act, and Chapters 50, 50A, 50B, 51, 52, and 52C of the General Statutes. This Article shall be construed to effect its general purpose to make uniform provisions of these Acts and Chapters 50, 50A, 50B, 51, 52, 52B, and 52C of the General Statutes.

The provisions of this Article governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or electronic signatures, or of contracts performed with the use of these records or signatures, conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001, et seq., or as otherwise authorized by federal or State law governing these electronic records or electronic signatures.

History.

1999-185, s. 1; 2005-187, s. 19.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-187, s. 19, effective October 1, 2005, and applies to agreements made on or after that date, designated the previously undesignated paragraph as subsection (a); in subsection (a), added “formerly” and “the Revised Uniform Arbitration Act in force in this State”; and added subsection (b). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§§ 50-63 through 50-69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.